Hawaii statutes.
§383-95 Disclosure of information. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, information obtained from any
employing unit or individual pursuant to the administration of this chapter and
determinations as to the benefit rights of any individual shall be held
confidential and shall not be disclosed or be open to public inspection in any
manner revealing the individual's or employing unit's identity. Any claimant
(or the claimant's legal representative) shall be supplied with information
from the records of the department to the extent necessary for the proper
presentation of the claimant's claim in any proceeding under this chapter.
Subject to restrictions as the director may by rule prescribe, reimbursement of
costs to the department incurred in furnishing the information, and the
establishment of all safeguards as are necessary to ensure that information
furnished by the department is used only for authorized purposes, the
information and determinations may be made available to:

(1) Any federal or state agency
charged with the administration of an unemployment compensation law or the
maintenance of a system of public employment offices;

(2) The Internal Revenue Service
of the United States Department of the Treasury;

(3) Any federal, state, or municipal
agency charged with the administration of a fair employment practice or
anti-discrimination law;

(4) Any other federal, state, or
municipal agency if the director deems that the disclosure to the agency serves
the public interest; and

(5) Any federal, state, or municipal agency if the
disclosure is authorized under section 303 of the Social Security Act and
section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(b) Information obtained in connection with
the administration of the employment service may be made available to persons
or agencies for purposes appropriate to the operation of a public employment
service.

(c) Upon requests therefor the department
shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the
administration of public works or assistance through public employment, and may
furnish to any state agency similarly charged, the name, address, ordinary
occupation and employment status of each recipient of benefits and the
recipient's rights to further benefits under this chapter.

(d) The department may request the Comptroller
of the Currency of the United States to cause an examination of the correctness
of any return or report of any national banking association rendered pursuant
to this chapter, and may in connection with the request transmit any of the
report or return to the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States as
provided in section 3305(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code. [L 1939, c
219, §10(g); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 32; RL 1945, §4274; RL 1955,
§93-94; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-95; am L 1969, c 16, §1; gen ch
1985; am L 1997, c 172, §3; am L 2015, c 35, §14]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next